New York, session 2025-2026, A11628.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subsection (i) of section 3216 of the insurance law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph 42 to read as follows: 3 (42) Every policy that provides medical, major medical, or similar 4 comprehensive type coverage shall include coverage for federal food and 5 drug administration approved expanded access to an investigational 6 medical product that has been shown to be effective, without the need 7 for any prior authorization determination. 8 § 2. Subsection (l) of section 3221 of the insurance law is amended by 9 adding a new paragraph 24 to read as follows: 10 (24) Every group or blanket policy that provides medical, major 11 medical, or similar comprehensive type coverage shall include coverage 12 for federal food and drug administration approved expanded access to an 13 investigational medical product that has been shown to be effective, 14 without the need for any prior authorization determination. 15 § 3. Section 4303 of the insurance law is amended by adding a new 16 subsection (22) to read as follows: 17 (22) Every contract issued by a medical expense indemnity corporation, 18 hospital service corporation, or health service corporation that 19 provides medical, major medical, or similar comprehensive type coverage 20 shall include coverage for federal food and drug administration approved 21 expanded access to an investigational medical product that has been 22 shown to be effective, without the need for any prior authorization 23 determination. 24 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to all 25 policies and contracts issued, renewed, modified, altered or amended on 26 or after such date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14857-02-6